Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-704
Civil action; assertion of defense; appropriate relief.

(1) A person or religious organization whose exercise of religion or religious service has been burdened or restricted, or is likely to be burdened or restricted, in violation of the First Freedom Act, may bring a civil action or assert such violation or impending violation as a defense in a judicial or administrative proceeding.

(2) This section applies regardless of whether the state or a political subdivision is a party to the judicial or administrative proceeding.

(3) A person or religious organization asserting a claim or defense under this section may obtain appropriate relief, including against the state or a political subdivision. Appropriate relief includes:

(a) Actual damages;

(b) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be appropriate; and

(c) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 4.